test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-viikkyd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - viikkâd: # Verb 'to run' - full paradigm
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viiǥǥam
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viiǥǥak
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: veekk
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viikkâp
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: viikkveʹted
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: veʹǩǩe 
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: viiǥǥât
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viʹǩǩem 
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: viʹǩǩiǩ 
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viiǥǥi
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [viiǥǥim, viiǥǥin]
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: viiǥǥid
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viʹǩǩe
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: viʹǩǩeš
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Sg1: viiǥǥžem
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Sg2: viiǥǥžiǩ
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Sg3: viiǥǥâž
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Pl1: [viiǥǥžep, viiǥǥžim, viiǥǥžin]
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Pl2: viiǥǥžid 
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Pl3: viiǥǥže
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Sg4: viiǥǥžet
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Sg1: viiǥǥčem
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Sg2: viiǥǥčiǩ
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Sg3: viiǥǥči
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Pl1: [viiǥǥčim, viiǥǥčin, viiǥǥčep]
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Pl2: viiǥǥčid
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Pl3: viiǥǥče
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Sg4: viiǥǥčeš
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+Sg2: viiǥǥ
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+Sg3: veeǥǥas
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+Pl1: viikkâp
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+Pl2: viikkâd
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+Pl3: vekkaz
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+ConNeg: viiǥǥ
     viikkâd+V+Imprt+ConNegII: vikku
     viikkâd+V+Actio+Ess: viikkmen
     viikkâd+V+Actio: viikkâm
     viikkâd+V+Act+PrsPrc: viikki
     viikkâd+V+Act+PrfPrc: viikkâm
     viikkâd+V+Pass+PrfPrc: vikkum
     viikkâd+V+VAbess: [viiǥǥkâni, viiǥǥkani, viiǥǥǩeânai, viiǥǥǩâni, viiǥǥǩani]
     viikkâd+V+Ger+Ess: viiǥǥeen
     viikkâd+V+Ger+Instr: viiǥǥeeʹl
